Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-3802
(UTC 102) Scope.

(UTC 102) The Nebraska Uniform Trust Code applies to express trusts, charitable or noncharitable, and trusts created pursuant to a statute, judgment, or decree that requires the trust to be administered in the manner of an express trust.

Laws 2003, LB 130, § 2.

It is clear from the plain language of this section that resulting and constructive trusts are not governed by the Nebraska Uniform Trust Code. Washington v. Conley, 273 Neb. 908, 734 N.W.2d 306 (2007).